DI-155
DIAGNOSTICS - SUB FUEL TANK SYSTEM

DI3MH-02

DTC 42 Fuel Tank Select Relay Circuit Malfunction
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI-138.
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
Conditions (a), (b) and (c) continue: * Openorshortinfuel tank selectrelay circuit
(a) Fuel tank changeover switch ON * Fueltank selectrelay
42 (Voltage of FPMS terminal is high) * Open orshortin subfuel pump circuit
(b) Voltage of FPM terminal is high  Subfuel pump
(c) Voltage of FPMR terminal is low « Shortin main fuel pump circuit (+B short)

WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI-138.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check fuel tank select relay (See page FI-56).

@

2 [ Check voltage between terminal FPMR of engine ECU connector and body
ground (See page DI-152, step 1).

OK> Go to step 4.
NG \

3 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between fuel tank change-
over switch and fuel tank select relay, fuel tank select relay and body ground
(See page IN-19).

NG> Replace fuel tank select relay.

then go to step 8.

NG> Repair or replace harness and connector, and
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4

Check operation of sub fuel pump (See page DI-152, step 5).

HINT:

Ifyouhavenohand -heldtester,andthengotostep5.

0K> Go to step 7.

B

Check sub fuel pump (See page FI-16).

NG> Replace sub fuel pump, and then go to step 8.

@

Check for open or short in harness and connector between sub fuel pump and
fuel tank select relay (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace, and then go to step 8.

Check for open and short in harness and connector between fuel tank select
relay and engine ECU, sub fuel tank forcing driving relay and engine ECU (See
page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace, and then go to step 8.
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8 | Check for short in harness and connector between main fuel pump and fuel tank
select relay (+B short circuit) (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace harness and conector.

OK
~_—

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).

2UZ-FEENGINE (RM630E)



